Washington statutes.
RCW 16.54.020

Disposition of abandoned animal by person having custody.

Any person having in his or her care, custody, or control any abandoned animal as defined in RCW 16.54.010, may deliver such animal to any animal care and control agency as defined in RCW 16.52.011 or to an animal rescue group as defined in RCW 82.04.040 having the facilities and resources necessary for the care of such animals. If such an animal care and control agency or animal rescue group cannot reasonably be identified to receive the animal, the person with whom the animal was abandoned may notify the sheriff of the county wherein the abandonment occurred.

[ 2020 c 158 s 8; 2011 c 336 s 425; 1955 c 190 s 2.]